sms/test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-naartal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - naartâl contract stem haapana: # Noun - full paradigm
     naartâl+N+Sg+Nom: naartâl
     naartâl+N+Sg+Gen: narttâl
     naartâl+N+Sg+Acc: narttâl
     naartâl+N+Sg+Ill: narttla
     naartâl+N+Sg+Loc: narttlest
     naartâl+N+Sg+Com: narttlin
     naartâl+N+Ess: narttlen
     naartâl+N+Par: narttled
     naartâl+N+Pl+Abe: [narttâltaa, narttâltää]
     naartâl+N+Pl+Nom: narttâl
     naartâl+N+Pl+Gen: narttli
     naartâl+N+Pl+Acc: narttlid
     naartâl+N+Pl+Ill: narttlid
     naartâl+N+Pl+Loc: narttlin
     naartâl+N+Pl+Com: narttlivuiʹm
     naartâl+N+Pl+Abe: [narttlitaa, narttlitää]
